Utah statutes.
26-20-9.   Criminal penalties.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b) the culpable mental state required for a criminal violation of this chapter is knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly as defined in Section 76-2-103.

(b)  The culpable mental state required for a criminal violation of this chapter for kickbacks and bribes under Section 26-20-4 is knowingly and intentionally as defined in Section 76-2-103.

(2)  The punishment for a criminal violation of any provision of this chapter, except as provided under Section 26-20-5, is determined by the cumulative value of the funds or other benefits received or claimed in the commission of all violations of a similar nature, and not by each separate violation.

(3)  Punishment for criminal violation of this chapter, except as provided under Section 26-20-5, is a felony of the second degree, felony of the third degree, class A misdemeanor, or class B misdemeanor based on the dollar amounts as prescribed by Subsection 76-6-412(1) for theft of property and services.



Amended by Chapter 48, 2007 General Session

